Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.745

Validation—1959 c 193.

Any covenants of the bonds issued by the University of Washington under the authority of chapter 254, Laws of 1957 not expressly authorized by said chapter but authorized in chapter 193, Laws of 1959 are hereby declared to be legal and binding in all respects.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.745. Prior: 1959 c 193 s 11. Formerly RCW 28.77.590.]